Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-807 Amendment of pre-effective-date
financing statement. (a) For purposes of this section, "pre-effective-date
financing statement" means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2013.

(b) On or after July 1, 2013, a person may add or delete
collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or
otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing
statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing
perfection as provided in this article; provided that the effectiveness of a
pre-effective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance
with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(d), if the law of this State governs perfection of a security interest, the
information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended on or after
July 1, 2013, only if:

(1) The pre-effective-date financing statement and an
amendment are filed in the office specified in section 490:9-501;

(2) An amendment is filed in the office specified in
section 490:9-501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an
initial financing statement that satisfies section 490:9-806(c); or

(3) An initial financing statement that provides the
information as amended and satisfies section 490:9‑806(c) is filed in the
office specified in section 490:9-501.

(d) If the law of this State governs
perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date
financing statement may be continued only under section 490:9‑805(c) and
(e) or 490:9-806.

(e) Whether or not the law of this State
governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a
pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this State may be terminated
after July 1, 2013, by filing a termination statement in the office in which
the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial
financing statement that satisfies section 490:9-806(c) has been filed in the
office governing perfection as provided in this article as the office in which
to file a financing statement. [L 2012, c 33, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next